Utah statutes.
31A-22-522.   Required provision for notice of termination.

(1)  A policy for group or blanket life insurance coverage issued or renewed after July 1, 2001, shall include a provision that obligates the policyholder to notify each employee or group member:

(a)  in writing;

(b)  30 days before the date the coverage is terminated; and

(c) (i)  that the group or blanket life insurance coverage is being terminated; and

(ii)  the rights the employee or group member has to convert coverage upon termination.

(2)  For a policy for group or blanket life insurance coverage described in Subsection (1), an insurer shall:

(a)  include a statement of a policyholder's obligations under Subsection (1) in the insurer's monthly notice to the policyholder of premium payments due; and

(b)  provide a sample notice to the policyholder at least once a year.

